Vermont, session 2025-2026, H779.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Intent * * *
Sec. 1. INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) shift the ways that our public kindergarten through grade 12 schools
partner with the Vermont State Colleges System in an effort to reduce financial
VT LEG #386190 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.779
2026 Page 2 of 7
and programmatic impact on public schools while still maintaining
opportunities for high school seniors;
(2) address the negative impacts of the early college pathway on high
schools, particularly those located in close proximity to participating college
campuses that have seen significant impacts on the school’s enrollment and
budget;
(3) ensure monies from the Education Fund shall be used to support our
public kindergarten through grade 12 schools; and
(4) increase equity in access to quality course and advanced learning for
high school students as the early college program is currently not as accessible
to lower income families or students in certain geographic areas of the State
due to fees charged by participating colleges and transportation costs or
limitations.
* * * Early College * * *
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 941 is amended to read:
§ 941. FLEXIBLE PATHWAYS INITIATIVE
* * *
(b) The Secretary shall develop, publish, and regularly update guidance, in
the form of technical assistance, sharing of best practices and model
documents, legal interpretations, and other support designed to assist school
districts:
VT LEG #386190 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.779
2026 Page 3 of 7
* * *
(3) To create opportunities for secondary students to pursue flexible
pathways to graduation that:
(A) increase aspiration and encourage postsecondary continuation of
training and education;
(B) are an integral component of a student’s personalized learning
plan; and
(C) include:
(i) applied or work-based learning opportunities, including career
and career technical education and internships;
(ii) virtual learning and blended learning;
(iii) dual enrollment opportunities as set forth in section 944 of
this title; and
(iv) early college programs as set forth in subsection 4011(e) of
this title; and [Repealed.]
(v) [Repealed.]
(vi) adult education and secondary credential opportunities as set
forth in section 945 of this title.
* * *
VT LEG #386190 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.779
2026 Page 4 of 7
Sec. 3. REPEALS
16 V.S.A. §§ 946 (early college) and 947 (early college program; report;
appropriation) are repealed.
* * * Dual Enrollment * * *
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 944 is amended to read:
§ 944. DUAL ENROLLMENT PROGRAM
(a) Program creation. There is created a statewide Dual Enrollment
Program to be a potential component of a student’s flexible pathway. The
Program shall include college courses offered on the campus of an accredited
postsecondary institution and college courses offered by an accredited
postsecondary institution on the campus of a secondary school. The Program
may include online college courses or components.
(b) Students.
* * *
(2) An eligible student may enroll in up to two four dual enrollment
courses prior to completion of secondary school for which neither the student
nor the student’s parent or guardian shall be required to pay tuition. A student
may enroll in courses offered while secondary school is in session and during
the summer.
* * *
VT LEG #386190 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.779
2026 Page 5 of 7
(h) Number of courses. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit a
school district’s authority to pay for more than the two four courses per eligible
student authorized by subdivision (b)(2) of this section; provided, however,
that payment under subdivision (f)(2) of this section shall not be made for
more than two four courses per eligible student.
* * *
* * * College-Level Programming for High School Students Working
Group * * *
Sec. 5. COLLEGE-LEVEL PROGRAMMING FOR HIGH SCHOOL
STUDENTS; WORKING GROUP; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the College-Level Programming for High
School Students Working Group to examine opportunities for high schools and
the Vermont State Colleges System to partner on providing college-level
programming to high school students, including within high school
classrooms.
(b) Membership. The Working Group shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Secretary of Education or designee;
(2) the President of the Community College of Vermont or designee;
(3) the President of Vermont State University or designee;
VT LEG #386190 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.779
2026 Page 6 of 7
(4) two superintendents appointed by the Vermont Superintendent’s
Association; and
(5) two curriculum coordinators appointed by the Vermont Curriculum
Leaders Association.
(c) Powers and duties. The Working Group shall study the provision of
college-level programming for high school students, including how the public
school system can partner with the Vermont State Colleges System to provide
college-level opportunities for interested students while still maintaining
programing within the public high schools that meets the needs of all students.
The Working Group shall also study how college-level programming may be
provided within high school classrooms. The Working Group shall include
funding recommendations to support any programmatic recommendations.
(d) Assistance. The Working Group shall have the administrative,
technical, and legal assistance of the Agency of Education.
(e) Report. On or before December 1, 2026, the Working Group shall
submit a written report to the House and Senate Committees on Education with
its programmatic and funding findings and any recommendations for
legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Secretary of Education shall call the first meeting of the
Working Group to occur on or before September 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386190 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.779
2026 Page 7 of 7
(2) The Working Group shall select a chair from among its members at
the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum, and
members are prohibited from abstaining from all votes taken regarding final
recommendations.
(4) The Working Group shall cease to exist on January 15, 2027.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Working Group
shall be entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as
permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than six meetings. These
payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the Agency of Education.
(h) Appropriation. The sum of $10,000.00 is appropriated to the Agency of
Education from the General Fund in fiscal year 2027 for per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses for members of the Working
Group.
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. 1 (intent), 4 (dual enrollment), and 5 (College-
Level Programming for High School Students Working Group) shall take
effect on July 1, 2026.
(b) Secs. 2 (16 V.S.A. § 941; flexible pathways) and 3 (repeals; early
college) shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
VT LEG #386190 v.1